src/fst/affixes/nouns.lexc
!! !!!Noun inflection
! ---------------
!! Meadow Mari noun inflection

!! !!a final lexica




!! Some Postpositions in Mari take possessive suffixes. For now, am allowing all an all, but
!! we should revisit this in the lexicon eventually - classifying postpositions into those that
!! take Px and those that do not.

!! Also here: some adverbs that take possessive suffixes, like ӱстембалне ''on the table'' > ӱстембалнем ''on my table''


LEXICON N_  !!= * @CODE@ redirects to N-ava_01
 : N-ava_01 ; 
 +Der/Priv:%>дымЫ2 A_ ;   ! вӱр 'blood' > вӱрдымӧ 'bloodless' - Privative derivation
 +Der/Poss:%>А2н A_ ;     ! вӱр 'blood' > вӱран 'bloody' - Possessive derivation
 +Der/Rel:%>Ы1%>сЫ2 A_ ;    ! вӱр 'blood' > вӱрысӧ 'of/in blood' - Relational derivation
 +Der/Rel+Err/Orth:%>сЫ2 A_ ;    ! Relational derivation with missing ы, i.e. вӱрсӧ - depreciated
 +Der/Pur:%>лык A_ ;      ! вӱр 'blood' > вӱрлык 'for blood' - Purposive derivation
 +LocPl+Der/Rel:%>лас%{еы%} A_ ; ! эл 'land' > элласе 'of/in lands' - Plur + Relational derivation

LEXICON N_SINGLE-SYLLABLE-U
! лу ну пу ру ту шу кӱ ю у
+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:%>ын K ;
+Sg+Acc+Err/Orth:%>ым K ;
+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Err/Orth:%>ыжЫ2 K ;
+Sg+Nom+PxPl3+Err/Orth:%>ышт K ;
+Sg+Ine+Err/Orth:%>ыштЫ2 K ;
+Sg+Ine+PxSg1+So/CP+Err/Orth:%>ыштем K ;
+Sg+Ine+PxSg2+So/CP+Err/Orth:%>ыштет K ;
+Sg+Ine+PxSg3+So/CP+Err/Orth:%>ыштыжЫ2 K ;
+Sg+Ine+PxPl1+So/CP+Err/Orth:%>ыштна K ;
+Sg+Ine+PxPl2+So/CP+Err/Orth:%>ыштда K ;
+Sg+Ine+PxPl3+So/CP+Err/Orth:%>ыштышт K ;

LEXICON N-continuation  !!= * @CODE@ comes from Proper nouns
               N-ava_01      ; 

!LEXICON N-ava !!= * @CODE@ to N-ava_01 and vocatives
!            :     N-ava_01 ;
!        +Voc:%>й  ENDLEX        ;
!  +Voc+PxSg1:%>ем ENDLEX        ;

LEXICON N-ava_01 !!= * @CODE@ obl because of pronouns
  N-SG-NOM       ;
  N-ava_01_obl ;

LEXICON   N-ava_01_obl !!= * @CODE@ to obl only
 N-ava_01_obl_without-hyphens ;
 N-ava_01_obl_with-hyphens ;
LEXICON   N-ava_01_obl_without-hyphens !!= * @CODE@ to obl only
  N-SG-GEN       ;
  N-SG-DAT       ;
  N-SG-ACC       ;
  N-SG-CMPR      ;
  N-SG-COM       ;
  N-SG-INE       ;
  N-SG-ILL       ;
  N-SG-LAT       ;
  N-SG-ABE       ;

  N-LOCPL-NOM  ;
  N-LOCPL-INE  ;
  N-LOCPL-ILL  ;
  N-LOCPL-LAT  ;

  N-ASSOCPL-ABE  ;
  N-ASSOCPL-ACC  ;
  N-ASSOCPL-CMPR ;
  N-ASSOCPL-COM  ;
  N-ASSOCPL-DAT  ;
  N-ASSOCPL-GEN  ;
  N-ASSOCPL-ILL  ;
  N-ASSOCPL-INE  ;
  N-ASSOCPL-LAT  ;
  N-ASSOCPL-NOM  ;

  N-SG-PxSg1-NOM ;
  N-SG-PxSg1-GEN ;
  N-SG-PxSg1-DAT ;
  N-SG-PxSg1-ACC ;
  N-SG-PxSg1-CMPR ;
  N-SG-PxSg1-COM ;
  N-SG-PxSg1-INE ;
  N-SG-PxSg1-ILL ;
  N-SG-PxSg1-LAT ;
  N-SG-PxSg1-ABE ;

  N-SG-PxSg2-NOM ;
  N-SG-PxSg2-GEN ;
  N-SG-PxSg2-DAT ;
  N-SG-PxSg2-ACC ;
  N-SG-PxSg2-CMPR ;
  N-SG-PxSg2-COM ;
  N-SG-PxSg2-INE ;
  N-SG-PxSg2-ILL ;
  N-SG-PxSg2-LAT ;
  N-SG-PxSg2-ABE ;

  N-SG-PxSg3-NOM ;
  N-SG-PxSg3-GEN ;
  N-SG-PxSg3-DAT ;
  N-SG-PxSg3-ACC ;
  N-SG-PxSg3-CMPR ;
  N-SG-PxSg3-COM ;
  N-SG-PxSg3-INE ;
  N-SG-PxSg3-ILL ;
  N-SG-PxSg3-LAT ;
  N-SG-PxSg3-ABE ;

  N-SG-PxPl1-NOM ;
  N-SG-PxPl1-GEN ;
  N-SG-PxPl1-DAT ;
  N-SG-PxPl1-ACC ;
  N-SG-PxPl1-CMPR ;
  N-SG-PxPl1-COM ;
  N-SG-PxPl1-INE ;
  N-SG-PxPl1-ILL ;
  N-SG-PxPl1-LAT ;
  N-SG-PxPl1-ABE ;

  N-SG-PxPl2-NOM ;
  N-SG-PxPl2-GEN ;
  N-SG-PxPl2-DAT ;
  N-SG-PxPl2-ACC ;
  N-SG-PxPl2-CMPR ;
  N-SG-PxPl2-COM ;
  N-SG-PxPl2-INE ;
  N-SG-PxPl2-ILL ;
  N-SG-PxPl2-LAT ;
  N-SG-PxPl2-ABE ;

  N-SG-PxPl3-NOM ;
  N-SG-PxPl3-GEN ;
  N-SG-PxPl3-DAT ;
  N-SG-PxPl3-ACC ;
  N-SG-PxPl3-CMPR ;
  N-SG-PxPl3-COM ;
  N-SG-PxPl3-INE ;
  N-SG-PxPl3-ILL ;
  N-SG-PxPl3-LAT ;
  N-SG-PxPl3-ABE ;

LEXICON   N-ava_01_obl_with-hyphens !!= * @CODE@ to obl only, also ООО-влак
  N-PL-ABE       ;
  N-PL-ACC       ;
  N-PL-CMPR      ;
  N-PL-COM       ;
  N-PL-DAT       ;
  N-PL-GEN       ;
  N-PL-ILL       ;
  N-PL-INE       ;
  N-PL-LAT       ;
  N-PL-NOM       ;

  N-PL-PxSg1-NOM ;
  N-PL-PxSg1-GEN ;
  N-PL-PxSg1-DAT ;
  N-PL-PxSg1-ACC ;
  N-PL-PxSg1-CMPR ;
  N-PL-PxSg1-COM ;
  N-PL-PxSg1-INE ;
  N-PL-PxSg1-ILL ;
  N-PL-PxSg1-LAT ;
  N-PL-PxSg1-ABE ;

  N-PL-PxSg2-NOM ;
  N-PL-PxSg2-GEN ;
  N-PL-PxSg2-DAT ;
  N-PL-PxSg2-ACC ;
  N-PL-PxSg2-CMPR ;
  N-PL-PxSg2-COM ;
  N-PL-PxSg2-INE ;
  N-PL-PxSg2-ILL ;
  N-PL-PxSg2-LAT ;
  N-PL-PxSg2-ABE ;

  N-PL-PxSg3-NOM ;
  N-PL-PxSg3-GEN ;
  N-PL-PxSg3-DAT ;
  N-PL-PxSg3-ACC ;
  N-PL-PxSg3-CMPR ;
  N-PL-PxSg3-COM ;
  N-PL-PxSg3-INE ;
  N-PL-PxSg3-ILL ;
  N-PL-PxSg3-LAT ;
  N-PL-PxSg3-ABE ;

  N-PL-PxPl1-NOM ;
  N-PL-PxPl1-GEN ;
  N-PL-PxPl1-DAT ;
  N-PL-PxPl1-ACC ;
  N-PL-PxPl1-CMPR ;
  N-PL-PxPl1-COM ;
  N-PL-PxPl1-INE ;
  N-PL-PxPl1-ILL ;
  N-PL-PxPl1-LAT ;
  N-PL-PxPl1-ABE ;

  N-PL-PxPl2-NOM ;
  N-PL-PxPl2-GEN ;
  N-PL-PxPl2-DAT ;
  N-PL-PxPl2-ACC ;
  N-PL-PxPl2-CMPR ;
  N-PL-PxPl2-COM ;
  N-PL-PxPl2-INE ;
  N-PL-PxPl2-ILL ;
  N-PL-PxPl2-LAT ;
  N-PL-PxPl2-ABE ;

  N-PL-PxPl3-NOM ;
  N-PL-PxPl3-GEN ;
  N-PL-PxPl3-DAT ;
  N-PL-PxPl3-ACC ;
  N-PL-PxPl3-CMPR ;
  N-PL-PxPl3-COM ;
  N-PL-PxPl3-INE ;
  N-PL-PxPl3-ILL ;
  N-PL-PxPl3-LAT ;
  N-PL-PxPl3-ABE ;

LEXICON N-OLD-ORTH-SG-NOM_  !!= * @CODE@
+Err/Orth+Sg+Nom: ENDLEX ;
!Commenting remainder out 2020-09-10. New stategy allows for a single form +Err/Orth+Sg+Nom
! in the original lexc lines, we now have two lines:
!альфе+v1+N:а•льф%{еы%} N_ ;
!альфе+v2+N:а•льф%{аы%} N-OLD-ORTH-SG-NOM_ ;
!+Err/Orth: ENDLEX ;
!+Err/Orth: N-PL-NOM ;
!+Err/Orth: N-PL-GEN ;
!+Err/Orth: N-PL-DAT ;
!+Err/Orth: N-PL-ACC ;
!+Err/Orth: N-PL-CMPR ;
!+Err/Orth: N-PL-COM ;
!+Err/Orth: N-PL-INE ;
!+Err/Orth: N-PL-ILL ;
!+Err/Orth: N-PL-LAT ;
!+Err/Orth: N-PL-ABE ;
!+Err/Orth: N-PL-PxSg1-NOM_NB-first ;
!+Err/Orth: N-PL-PxSg1-GEN_NB-first ;
!+Err/Orth: N-PL-PxSg1-DAT_NB-first ;
!+Err/Orth: N-PL-PxSg1-ACC_NB-first ;
!+Err/Orth: N-PL-PxSg1-CMPR_NB-first ;
!+Err/Orth: N-PL-PxSg1-COM_NB-first ;
!+Err/Orth: N-PL-PxSg1-INE_NB-first ;
!+Err/Orth: N-PL-PxSg1-ILL_NB-first ;
!+Err/Orth: N-PL-PxSg1-LAT_NB-first ;
!+Err/Orth: N-PL-PxSg1-ABE_NB-first ;

!+Err/Orth: N-PL-PxSg2-NOM_NB-first ;
!+Err/Orth: N-PL-PxSg2-GEN_NB-first ;
!+Err/Orth: N-PL-PxSg2-DAT_NB-first ;
!+Err/Orth: N-PL-PxSg2-ACC_NB-first ;
!+Err/Orth: N-PL-PxSg2-CMPR_NB-first ;
!+Err/Orth: N-PL-PxSg2-COM_NB-first ;
!+Err/Orth: N-PL-PxSg2-INE_NB-first ;
!+Err/Orth: N-PL-PxSg2-ILL_NB-first ;
!+Err/Orth: N-PL-PxSg2-LAT_NB-first ;
!+Err/Orth: N-PL-PxSg2-ABE_NB-first ;

!+Err/Orth: N-PL-PxSg3-NOM_NB-first ;
!+Err/Orth: N-PL-PxSg3-GEN_NB-first ;
!+Err/Orth: N-PL-PxSg3-DAT_NB-first ;
!+Err/Orth: N-PL-PxSg3-ACC_NB-first ;
!+Err/Orth: N-PL-PxSg3-CMPR_NB-first ;
!+Err/Orth: N-PL-PxSg3-COM_NB-first ;
!+Err/Orth: N-PL-PxSg3-INE_NB-first ;
!+Err/Orth: N-PL-PxSg3-ILL_NB-first ;
!+Err/Orth: N-PL-PxSg3-LAT_NB-first ;
!+Err/Orth: N-PL-PxSg3-ABE_NB-first ;

!+Err/Orth: N-PL-PxPl1-NOM_NB-first ;
!+Err/Orth: N-PL-PxPl1-GEN_NB-first ;
!+Err/Orth: N-PL-PxPl1-DAT_NB-first ;
!+Err/Orth: N-PL-PxPl1-ACC_NB-first ;
!+Err/Orth: N-PL-PxPl1-CMPR_NB-first ;
!+Err/Orth: N-PL-PxPl1-COM_NB-first ;
!+Err/Orth: N-PL-PxPl1-INE_NB-first ;
!+Err/Orth: N-PL-PxPl1-ILL_NB-first ;
!+Err/Orth: N-PL-PxPl1-LAT_NB-first ;
!+Err/Orth: N-PL-PxPl1-ABE_NB-first ;

!+Err/Orth: N-PL-PxPl2-NOM_NB-first ;
!+Err/Orth: N-PL-PxPl2-GEN_NB-first ;
!+Err/Orth: N-PL-PxPl2-DAT_NB-first ;
!+Err/Orth: N-PL-PxPl2-ACC_NB-first ;
!+Err/Orth: N-PL-PxPl2-CMPR_NB-first ;
!+Err/Orth: N-PL-PxPl2-COM_NB-first ;
!+Err/Orth: N-PL-PxPl2-INE_NB-first ;
!+Err/Orth: N-PL-PxPl2-ILL_NB-first ;
!+Err/Orth: N-PL-PxPl2-LAT_NB-first ;
!+Err/Orth: N-PL-PxPl2-ABE_NB-first ;

!+Err/Orth: N-PL-PxPl3-NOM_NB-first ;
!+Err/Orth: N-PL-PxPl3-GEN_NB-first ;
!+Err/Orth: N-PL-PxPl3-DAT_NB-first ;
!+Err/Orth: N-PL-PxPl3-ACC_NB-first ;
!+Err/Orth: N-PL-PxPl3-CMPR_NB-first ;
!+Err/Orth: N-PL-PxPl3-COM_NB-first ;
!+Err/Orth: N-PL-PxPl3-INE_NB-first ;
!+Err/Orth: N-PL-PxPl3-ILL_NB-first ;
!+Err/Orth: N-PL-PxPl3-LAT_NB-first ;
!+Err/Orth: N-PL-PxPl3-ABE_NB-first ;





!! !! DECLENSION 


!! !Case suffixes
!! Each case-number-person has its own lexicon.
