src/fst/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON nouns
акробатке+N:акроба•тк%{аы%} N-OLD-ORTH-SG-NOM_  "" ;
алканкӧрж+N:алканкӧ•рж N_  "" ;
аренде+N:аренд%{аы%} N-OLD-ORTH-SG-NOM_  "vuokra(us)" ;
атмавара+N:атмавара• N_  "" ;
базе+N:баз%{аы%} N-OLD-ORTH-SG-NOM_  "tukikohta" ;
берданке+N:берданк%{аы%} N-OLD-ORTH-SG-NOM_  "berdan-kivääri" ;
бродяге+N:бродяг%{аы%} N-OLD-ORTH-SG-NOM_  "kulkuri" ;
броневик+N:броневи•к N_  "panssariauto" ;
величестве+N:величеств%{оы%} N-OLD-ORTH-SG-NOM_  "" ;
вермут+N:ве•рмут N_  "" ;
вичур+N:вичур N_  "" ;
воеводо+N:воевод%{аы%} N-OLD-ORTH-SG-NOM_  "(vanh.) voivodi" ;
вооружитлыме+N:вооружи•тлыме N_  "" ;
вӱдшыҥа+N:вӱдшыҥа• N_  "" ;
гауптвахте+N:гаунтвахт%{аы%} N-OLD-ORTH-SG-NOM_  "(arestilaisten) päävartio" ;
гитар+N:гита•р%{аы%} N-OLD-ORTH-SG-NOM_  "kitara" ;
графин+N:графи•н N_  "karahvi" ;
гротехнике+v2+N+Err/Orth:гротехник%{аы%} N-OLD-ORTH-SG-NOM_  "" ;
десятине+v2+N+Err/Orth:десятин%{аы%} N-OLD-ORTH-SG-NOM_  "desjatiina (1,0ъ ha)" ;
доказательстве+N:доказа•тельств%{оы%} N-OLD-ORTH-SG-NOM_  "todiste" ;
драматург+N:драмату•рг N_  "näytelmäkirjailija" ;
единице+v2+N+Err/Orth:еди•ниц%{аы%} N-OLD-ORTH-SG-NOM_  "yksikkö" ;
заметке+N:заметк%{аы%} N-OLD-ORTH-SG-NOM_  "uutinen" ;
землечерпалке+N:землечерпалк%{аы%} N-OLD-ORTH-SG-NOM_  "ketjuruoppari(kone)" ;
игывож+N:игыво•ж N_  "myöhäiskasvuinen juuri" ;
индырыше+N:и•ндырыш%{еы%} N_  "" ;
инсценировко+N:инсценировк%{аы%} N-OLD-ORTH-SG-NOM_  "sovitus (näyttämölle)" ;
йоргалымаш+N:йоргалымаш N_  "" ;
йӧсылык+N:йӧ•сылык N_  "vaikeus" ;
каморко+N:каморк%{аы%} N-OLD-ORTH-SG-NOM_  "komero" ;
каннибал+N:канниба•л N_  "" ;
картычке+N:карточк%{аы%} N-OLD-ORTH-SG-NOM_  "kortti" ;
келгывер+N:келгыве•р N_  "" ;
керосинке+N:керосинк%{аы%} N-OLD-ORTH-SG-NOM_  "öljykeitin" ;
клинике+v2+N:клиник%{аы%} N-OLD-ORTH-SG-NOM_  "klinikka" ;
клюшко+N:клю•шк%{оы%} N_  "" ;
кольчуго+v1+N:кольчуг%{аы%} N-OLD-ORTH-SG-NOM_  "" ;
комбинезон+N:комбинезо•н N_  "haalari(t)" ;
контур+v1+N:ко•нтур%{аы%} N-OLD-ORTH-SG-NOM_  "ääriviiva" ;
коршаҥгыгайык+N:коршаҥгыга•йык N_  "hemppo(nen)" ;
крестьянстве+v1+N:крестьянство N-OLD-ORTH-SG-NOM_  "maanviljelys" ;
кугыргымаш+N:кугыргымаш N_  "" ;
кута-рож+N:кута-рож N_  "" ;
кӧсяк+N:кӧсяк N_  "" ;
лачан+N:лача•н N_  "" ;
лейке+v1+N:лейк%{аы%} N-OLD-ORTH-SG-NOM_  "kastelukannu" ;
ложо+Hom1+v1+N:лож%{аы%} N-OLD-ORTH-SG-NOM_  "aitio" ;
лукаҥдалтмаш+N:лукаҥдалтмаш N_  "" ;
малахит+N:малахи•т N_  "" ;
махорко+v1+N:махорк%{аы%} N-OLD-ORTH-SG-NOM_  "mahorkka" ;
мещанстве+v1+N:мещанств%{оы%} N-OLD-ORTH-SG-NOM_  "pikkuporvaristo" ;
меҥыраланымаш+N:меҥыраланымаш N_  "" ;
морфеме+v1+N:морфем%{аы%} N-OLD-ORTH-SG-NOM_  "" ;
муношо+N:муно•ш%{оы%} N_  "(munan) valkuainen" ;
настойко+N:насто•йк%{оы%} N_  "mausteviina" ;
нюка+N:нюка• N_  "" ;
нӧшмыгучо+v1+N:нӧшмыгуч%{аы%} N-OLD-ORTH-SG-NOM_  "" ;
олашуэ+N:олашуэ• N_  "" ;
ответственность+N:отве•тственность N_  "vastuu" ;
отраве+v1+N:отрав%{аы%} N-OLD-ORTH-SG-NOM_  "myrkky" ;
парашютистке+N:парашюти•стк%{еы%} N_  "" ;
перекличке+v1+N:перекличк%{аы%} N-OLD-ORTH-SG-NOM_  "nimenhuuto" ;
подряд+N:подря•д N_  "" ;
поликлинике+v1+N:поликлиник%{аы%} N-OLD-ORTH-SG-NOM_  "poliklinikka" ;
причёско+v1+N:причёск%{аы%} N-OLD-ORTH-SG-NOM_  "kampaus" ;
пуйырмаш+N:пуйырмаш N_  "" ;
разбой+N:разбо•й N_  "" ;
ракетке+v1+N:ракетк%{аы%} N-OLD-ORTH-SG-NOM_  "tennismaila" ;
румынке+v2+N:румы•нк%{аы%} N-OLD-ORTH-SG-NOM_  "romanialainen (nainen)" ;
санаций+N:сана•ций N_  "" ;
скрипке+v2+N:скри•пк%{аы%} N-OLD-ORTH-SG-NOM_  "" ;
столбняк+N:столбня•к N_  "" ;
строительстве+v1+N:строительств%{оы%} N-OLD-ORTH-SG-NOM_  "rakennustyö" ;
темп+v1+N:темр%{оы%} N-OLD-ORTH-SG-NOM_  "tempo" ;
терабит+N:тераби•т N_  "" ;
тыгыде+N:ты•гыд%{еы%} N_  "pieni esine/palanen" ;
урналтмаш+N:урналтмаш N_  "" ;
фабрике+v1+N:фабрик%{аы%} N-OLD-ORTH-SG-NOM_  "tehdas" ;
хирагане+v2+N:хира•ган%{аы%} N-OLD-ORTH-SG-NOM_  "" ;
чердак+N:черда•к N_  "" ;
шеледымаш+N:шеледыма•ш N_  "jakelu" ;
школьнице+v1+N:школьниц%{аы%} N-OLD-ORTH-SG-NOM_  "" ;
шувыртылмаш+N:шувыртылмаш N_  "" ;
ынтайле+N:ынтайл%{еы%} N_  "" ;
юбко+v1+N:юбк%{аы%} N-OLD-ORTH-SG-NOM_  "hame" ;
ӧгӧ+N:ӧ•г%{ӧы%} N_  "viila" ;
